Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 8. DEATH AND DISPOSITION OF THE BODY

SUBTITLE A. DEATH

CHAPTER 671A. NOTICE REQUIRED AT PRIVATE AUTOPSY FACILITY

Sec. 671A.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "private autopsy facility" means a facility that is owned or operated by a physician who performs autopsy services for a fee or that employs a physician to perform autopsy services for a fee, including autopsy services performed on the order of a justice of the peace. The term does not include a medical examiner's office.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 374 (S.B. 256), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 671A.002. NOTICE FOR COMPLAINTS REQUIRED. (a) A private autopsy facility shall post a notice in a conspicuous place in a public area of the facility that substantially complies with the notice published by the Texas Medical Board under this section.

(b) The notice must state in English and in Spanish that a person may file with the Texas Medical Board a complaint against a physician who performs autopsy services and must include the appropriate mailing address and telephone number of the Texas Medical Board for filing complaints against physicians.

(c) The Texas Medical Board by rule shall adopt a sample form of the notice. The board shall publish the notice on the board's Internet website.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 374 (S.B. 256), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 671A.003. CRIMINAL PENALTY FOR FAILURE TO POST NOTICE. (a) A private autopsy facility commits an offense if the facility fails to post the notice required by this chapter.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 374 (S.B. 256), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.